South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S86.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Chapter 26, Title 59 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 59-26-42.  A person who holds a professional certificate issued by the South Carolina Department of Education for twenty or more years and who teaches in this State for twenty or more years may renew annually the certificate by participating in required district professional development without having to satisfy any additional renewal requirements. If a teacher is required to perform specific training, it can be specified in the teacher's annual contract. The provisions of this section apply notwithstanding the provisions of the Certificate Renewal Plan developed by the Office of Teacher Certification or another provision of law. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----